North Carolina, session 2025, HB868.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 90-95 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-95. Violations; penalties.
(a) Except as authorized by this Article, it is unlawful for any person:
…
(3) To possess a controlled substance.
…
(f1) Unless the context requires otherwise, for purposes of this section, the following
definitions shall apply:
(1) Colorimetric field drug test. – A field-testing drug kit that consists of color
test reagents for the preliminary identification of narcotic drugs in their pure
or diluted forms. It does not apply to kits that use thin layer chromatography
as the identification procedure or to kits that identify drugs in body fluids.
(2) Corroborating chemical analysis. – A chemical analysis following a
colorimetric field drug test used to confirm or contradict the veracity of a
colorimetric field drug test, when that chemical analysis has been performed
by the North Carolina State Crime Laboratory or any other crime laboratory
meeting similar standards of scientific testing and court-related evidence
preparation and preservation.
*H868-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f2) No later than January 1, 2026, all law enforcement agencies and prosecutorial districts
in the State shall adopt policies governing the arrest and prosecution of violations of
G.S. 90-95(a)(3) that ensure reliable and accurate identification of controlled substances for the
purpose of maintaining the integrity of convictions for those violations. The policies adopted
pursuant to this subsection shall include, at a minimum, each of the following:
(1) Prior to the results of a corroborating chemical analysis, a colorimetric field
drug test shall not be sufficient, by itself, for the determination of any of the
following:
a. Probable cause to arrest.
b. Initiating charges.
c. Conviction.
d. Sentencing following a conviction.
(2) When a colorimetric field drug test has been conducted and there has been no
corroborating chemical analysis, in the absence of any conflicting statutory
provision, individuals charged shall be either:
a. Cited and released, when citation is permitted by law for the alleged
crimes of the individual.
b. Released upon the defendant's written promise to appear in court
pursuant to the setting of conditions of pretrial release under
G.S. 15A-534 and other applicable statutes.
Criminal process issued or conditions of release set pursuant to this
subdivision shall only be required for crimes charged under G.S. 90-95(a)(3)
and shall not be construed to apply to the criminal process or conditions of
pretrial release for any other crimes for which the individual is charged or
arrested.
(3) Any individual charged shall be entitled to plead to the charge and
subsequently withdraw that plea and move for dismissal of the charges in the
event of a corroborating chemical analysis that finds there was no controlled
substance in the sample of the test at any time during the pendency of the case
or subsequent entry of the plea.
…."
SECTION 2. Part 1 of Article 26 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-534.9. Possession of controlled substances; bail and pretrial release.
When conditions of pretrial release are being determined for a defendant charged with a
violation of G.S. 90-95(a)(3), the conditions of pretrial release for that specific charge shall
comply with the provisions of G.S. 90-95(f2)."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 868-First Edition